Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.070

Administrative committees.

There shall be administrative committees of the state government, which shall be known as: (1) The state finance committee and (2) the state capitol committee.

[ 1982 c 40 s 8; 1965 c 8 s 43.17.070. Prior: 1929 c 115 s 3; 1921 c 7 s 4; RRS s 10762.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 40: See note following RCW 29A.12.020.

State capitol committee: Chapter 43.34 RCW.

State finance committee: Chapter 43.33 RCW.